California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(B) If the petitioner is a person other than the director of a county behavioral health agency, or their designee, the court shall order a county agency, or their designee, as determined by the court, to investigate, as necessary, file a written report with the court as soon as practicable, but within 30 court days, and provide notice to the respondent and petitioner that a report has been ordered. Parties shall complete the investigation with appropriate urgency. The written report shall include all of the
 following:

(i) A determination as to whether the respondent meets, or is likely to meet, the criteria for the CARE process.

(ii) The outcome of efforts made to voluntarily engage the respondent during the report period.

(iii) Conclusions and recommendations about the respondent’s ability to voluntarily engage in services.

(iv) The information, including protected health information, necessary to support the determinations, conclusions, and recommendations in the report.

(4) If, upon a request by the county agency ordered to investigate and file a report under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), the court finds
 that the county agency is making progress to engage the respondent, the court may, in its discretion, grant the county agency no more than 30 additional days to continue to work with, engage, and enroll the individual in voluntary treatment and services. The county agency shall provide notice to the respondent and petitioner that an extension for filing a report has been granted.

(5) Upon receipt of the report described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), the court shall, within five days, take one of the following actions:

(A) If the court determines that voluntary engagement with the respondent is effective, and that the individual has enrolled or is likely to enroll in voluntary behavioral health treatment, the court shall dismiss the matter.

(B) If the court determines, based on the county agency’s report, that the evidence does not support a prima facie showing that the respondent is, or may be, a person described in Section 5972, the court shall dismiss the matter. This section shall not prevent a county behavioral health agency from continuing to voluntarily engage with a person not described in Section 5972 but who is in need of services and supports.

(C) If the court determines, based on the county agency’s report, that the evidence does support a prima facie showing that the respondent is, or may be, a person described in Section 5972, and engagement with the county agency was not effective, the court shall do all of the following:

(i) Set an
 initial appearance on the petition within 14 court days.

(ii) Appoint a qualified legal services project, as defined in Sections 6213 to 6214.5, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code or, if no legal services project has agreed to accept these appointments, a public defender or other counsel working in that capacity to represent the respondent.

(iii) Order the county agency to provide notice of the initial appearance to the petitioner, the respondent, the appointed counsel, the county behavioral health agency in the county where the respondent resides, and, if different, the county where the CARE court proceedings have commenced.

(b) At the initial appearance on the petition, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The court shall permit the respondent to substitute their own counsel.

(2) Petitioner shall be present. If the petitioner is not present, the matter may be dismissed.

(3) Respondent may waive personal appearance and appear through counsel. If the respondent does not waive personal appearance and does not appear at the hearing, and the court makes a finding in open court that reasonable attempts to elicit the attendance of the respondent have failed, the court may conduct the hearing in the respondent’s absence if the court makes a finding in open court that conducting the hearing without the participation or presence of the respondent would be in the respondent’s best interest.

(4) A representative from the county behavioral health agency shall be present.

(5) If the respondent asserts that they are enrolled in a federally recognized Indian tribe or are receiving services from an Indian health care provider, a tribal court, or a tribal organization, a representative from the program, the tribe, or the tribal court shall be allowed to be present, subject to the consent of the respondent. The tribal representative shall be entitled to notice by the county of the initial appearance.

(6) (A) If the petitioner is a person other than the director of a county behavioral health agency, or their designee, the court shall issue an order relieving the original petitioner and
 appointing the director of the county behavioral health agency or their designee as the successor petitioner.

(B) If the original petitioner is described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 5974, all of the following apply:

(i) The original petitioner shall have the right to be present and make a statement at the initial hearing on the merits of the petition held pursuant to paragraph (7).

(ii) (I) Until July 1, 2025, the court may, in its discretion, assign ongoing rights of notice to the original petitioner.

(II) Commencing July 1, 2025, unless the court determines, either upon its own motion or upon the motion of the respondent, at any
 point in the proceedings, that it likely would be detrimental to the treatment or well-being of the respondent, the court shall provide ongoing notice of proceedings to the original petitioner throughout the CARE proceedings, including notice of when a continuance is granted or when a case is dismissed. If a continuance is granted, the notice shall provide a general reason for the continuance, including the absence of the respondent or one of the grounds pursuant to Rule 3.1332 of the California Rules of Court. If a case is dismissed, the notice shall specify the statutory basis for the dismissal. A notice pursuant to this clause shall not disclose any patient information that is protected under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191), the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code), or
 this act, without the respondent’s consent.

(iii) To the extent that the respondent consents, the court may allow the original petitioner to participate in the respondent’s CARE proceedings.

(iv) The original petitioner may file a new petition with the court, pursuant to Section 5974, if the matter is dismissed and there is a change in circumstances.

(C) If the original petitioner is not described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 5974, the court shall not assign ongoing rights to the original petitioner, other than the right to be present and make a statement at the hearing on the merits of the petition held pursuant to paragraph (7).

(7) (A) The court shall set a hearing on the merits of the petition within 10 days, at which time the court shall determine whether, by clear and convincing evidence, the respondent meets the CARE criteria in Section 5972. In making this determination, the court shall consider all evidence properly before it, including any report from the county behavioral health agency ordered pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and any additional admissible evidence presented by the parties, including the petition submitted and any statement given by the original petitioner. A licensed behavioral health professional may testify as an expert concerning whether the respondent meets the CARE criteria in Section 5972 provided that the court finds that the professional has special knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education sufficient to qualify as an expert under Section 720 of the Evidence Code.

(B) The hearing on the merits of the petition may be conducted concurrently with the initial appearance upon stipulation of the successor petitioner and the respondent, subject to the approval by the court.

(c) (1) If, at the hearing on the merits of the petition, the court finds there is not clear and convincing evidence that the respondent meets the CARE criteria in Section 5972, the court shall dismiss the case without prejudice, unless the court makes a finding, in open court, that the original petitioner’s filing was not in good faith, in which case the dismissal shall be with prejudice.

(2) If, at the hearing on the merits of the petition, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
 respondent meets the CARE criteria in Section 5972, the court shall order the county behavioral health agency to work with the respondent, the respondent’s counsel, and the supporter to engage the respondent in behavioral health treatment and attempt to enter into a CARE agreement. The court shall set a case management hearing within 14 days.

(3) If the respondent is enrolled in a federally recognized Indian tribe, the county shall provide notice of the case management hearing to the tribe, subject to the consent of the respondent.

(d) The following shall apply to any written report submitted by a county behavioral health agency to the court pursuant to this section:

(1) The report is confidential and not subject
 to disclosure or inspection under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) The report is inadmissible in any subsequent legal proceeding, except upon motion of the respondent in that subsequent legal proceeding.

(3) The report shall be confidential pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5976.5.

(4) This subdivision shall not affect the applicability of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5977.1, make admissible any evidence that is not otherwise admissible, or permit a witness to base an opinion on any matter that is not a proper basis for such an opinion. The admission or exclusion of evidence shall be pursuant to the
 rules of evidence established by the Evidence Code, including, but not limited to, Section 352 of the Evidence Code, and by judicial decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 5.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5977.1.

(a) (1) At the case management hearing, the court shall hear evidence as to whether the parties have entered, or are likely to enter, into a CARE agreement.

(2) If the court finds that the parties have entered, or are likely to enter, into a CARE agreement, the court shall do one of the following:

(A) Approve the terms of the CARE agreement or modify the terms of the CARE agreement and approve the agreement as modified by the court, and continue the matter and set a progress hearing for 60 days.

(B) Continue the matter for 14 days to allow
 the parties additional time to enter into a CARE agreement, upon stipulation of the parties.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the parties from agreeing to, and the court from approving, amendments to the CARE agreement.

(4) The court may, in its discretion, call additional progress hearings beyond the hearing set at 60 days, for the duration of the CARE agreement.

(b) If the court finds that the parties have not entered into a CARE agreement, and are not likely to enter into a CARE agreement, the court shall order the county behavioral health agency, through a licensed behavioral health professional, to conduct a clinical evaluation of the respondent, unless there is an existing clinical
 evaluation of the respondent completed within the last 30 days and the parties stipulate to the use of that evaluation. The evaluation shall address, at a minimum, the following:

(1) A clinical diagnosis of the respondent.

(2) Whether the respondent has the legal capacity to give informed consent regarding psychotropic medication.

(3) Any other information as ordered by the court or that the licensed behavioral health professional conducting the evaluation determines would help the court make future informed decisions about the appropriate care and services the respondent should receive.

(4) An analysis of recommended services, programs, housing, medications,
 and interventions that support the recovery and stability of the respondent.

(c) (1) The court shall set a clinical evaluation hearing to review the evaluation within 21 days. The court shall order the county to file the evaluation with the court and provide the evaluation to the respondent’s counsel no later than five days prior to the scheduled clinical evaluation hearing. The clinical evaluation hearing may be continued for a maximum of 14 days upon stipulation of the respondent and the county behavioral health agency, unless there is good cause for a longer extension.

(2) At the clinical evaluation review hearing, the court shall review the evaluation and other evidence from the county behavioral health agency and the respondent. The county behavioral health
 agency and the respondent may present evidence and call witnesses, including the person who conducted the evaluation. Only relevant and admissible evidence that fully complies with the rules of evidence may be considered by the court.

(3) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the respondent, by clear and convincing evidence, meets the CARE criteria in Section 5972 and make orders as follows:

(A) If the court finds that the respondent meets the CARE criteria, the court shall order the county behavioral health agency, the respondent, and the respondent’s counsel and supporter to jointly develop a CARE plan within 14 days.

(B) If the court does not find that clear and convincing evidence establishes
 that the respondent meets the CARE criteria, the court shall dismiss the petition.

(4) If the respondent is a self-identified American Indian or Alaska Native individual, as defined in Sections 1603(13), 1603(28), and 1679(a) of Title 25 of the United States Code, has been determined eligible as an Indian under Section 136.12 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or is currently receiving services from an Indian health care provider or tribal court, the county behavioral health agency shall use its best efforts to meaningfully consult with and incorporate the Indian health care provider or tribal court available to the respondent to develop the CARE plan.

(5) The evaluation and all reports, documents, and filings submitted to the court shall be confidential.

(6) The date for the hearing to review and consider approval of the proposed CARE plan shall be set not more than 14 days from the date of the order to develop a CARE plan, unless the court finds good cause for an extension. The party requesting an extension of time for the CARE plan review hearing shall provide notice to the opposing party and their counsel of the request for extension of time, and the court’s order if the request is granted.

(d) (1) At the CARE plan review hearing, the parties shall present their plan or plans to the court. The county behavioral health agency or the respondent, or both, may present a proposed CARE plan.

(2) After consideration of the plans proposed by the parties, the court
 shall adopt the elements of a CARE plan that support the recovery and stability of the respondent. The court may issue any orders necessary to support the respondent in accessing appropriate services and supports, including prioritization for those services and supports, subject to applicable laws and available funding pursuant to Section 5982. These orders shall constitute the CARE plan and may be amended.

(3) A court may order medication if it finds, upon review of the court-ordered evaluation and hearing from the parties, that, by clear and convincing evidence, the respondent lacks the capacity to give informed consent to the administration of medically necessary stabilization medication. To the extent the court orders medically necessary stabilization medication, the medication shall not be forcibly administered and the
 respondent’s failure to comply with a medication order shall not result in a penalty, including, but not limited to, contempt or termination of the CARE plan pursuant to Section 5979.

(4) If the proposed CARE plan includes services and supports, such as housing, provided directly or indirectly through another local governmental entity, that local entity may agree to provide the service or support, or the court may consider a motion by either of the parties to add the local entity as a party to the CARE proceeding. If the local entity agrees to provide the service or support, it may request to be added as a party by the court.

(5) If, after presentation of the CARE plan or plans, the court determines that additional information is needed, including from a licensed behavioral health
 professional, the court shall order a supplemental report to be filed by the county behavioral health agency for which the court may grant a continuance of no more than 14 days, unless there is good cause for a longer extension.

(6) If there is no CARE plan because the parties have not had sufficient time to complete it, the court may grant a continuance of no more than 14 days, unless there is good cause for a longer extension.

(7) This subdivision does not prohibit the parties from agreeing to, and the court from approving, amendments to the CARE plan. The court may also approve amendments to the CARE plan upon the finding that those amendments are necessary to support the respondent in accessing appropriate services and supports, following a hearing on the issue.

(e) The issuance of an order approving a CARE plan pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) begins the CARE process timeline, which shall not exceed one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 6.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5977.2.

(a) (1) At intervals set by the court and not less frequently than every 60 days after the court orders the CARE plan, the court shall hold a status review hearing. The county behavioral health agency shall file with the court and serve on the respondent, and the respondent’s counsel and supporter, a report no fewer than five court days prior to the review hearing with the following information:

(A) The progress that the respondent has made on the CARE plan.

(B) What services and supports in the CARE plan were provided, and what services and supports were not provided.

(C) Any issues the respondent expressed or exhibited in adhering to the CARE plan.

(D) Recommendations for changes to the services and supports to make the CARE plan more successful.

(2) The respondent shall be permitted to respond to the report submitted by the county behavioral health agency and to the county behavioral health agency’s testimony. The respondent shall be permitted to introduce their own information and recommendations.

(3) Subject to applicable law, intermittent lapses or setbacks described in this section of the report shall not impact access to services, treatment, or housing.

(b) The county behavioral health agency or the respondent may request, or the court upon its own motion may set, a hearing to occur at any time during the CARE process to address a change of circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 15.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5977.3.

(a) (1) In the 11th month of the process timeline, the court shall hold a one-year status hearing. Not fewer than five court days prior to the one-year status hearing, the county behavioral health agency shall file a report with the court and shall serve the report on the respondent and the respondent’s counsel and supporter. The report shall include the following information:

(A) The progress that the respondent has made on the CARE plan, including a final assessment of the respondent’s stability.

(B) What services and supports in the CARE plan were provided, and what services and supports were not
 provided, over the life of the program.

(C) Any issues the respondent expressed or exhibited in adhering to the CARE plan.

(D) Recommendations for next steps, including what ongoing and additional services would benefit the respondent that the county behavioral health agency can facilitate or provide.

(2) At an evidentiary hearing, the respondent shall be permitted to respond to the report submitted by the county behavioral health agency and to the county behavioral health agency’s testimony. The respondent shall be permitted to introduce their own information and recommendations. The respondent shall have the right at the hearing to call witnesses and to present evidence as to whether the respondent agrees with the
 report. The respondent may request either to be graduated from the program or to remain in the program.

(3) The court shall issue an order as follows:

(A) If the respondent requests to be graduated from the program, and the respondent has successfully completed the CARE process, the court shall order the county behavioral health agency and the respondent to work jointly on a voluntary graduation plan and the court shall schedule a hearing in the 12th month after adoption of the CARE plan for presentation of the graduation plan. The court shall review the graduation plan and recite the
 terms in open court. The graduation plan shall not place additional requirements on local governmental entities and is not enforceable by the court, except that the graduation plan may, at the respondent’s election, include a psychiatric advance directive, which shall have the force of law. Upon completion of the hearing, the respondent shall be officially graduated from the program.

(B) If the respondent requests to remain in the CARE process, the respondent may request any amount of time, up to and including one additional year. The court may approve the request and thereby permit the ongoing voluntary participation of the respondent if the court finds both of the following:

(i) The respondent did not successfully complete the CARE plan.

(ii) The respondent would benefit from continuation of the CARE plan.

(C) The court shall issue an order permitting the respondent to continue in the CARE plan or denying the respondent’s request to remain in the CARE plan, and state its reasons in open court.

(b) The respondent may be involuntarily reappointed to the program only if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The respondent did not successfully complete the CARE process.

(2) All services and supports required through the CARE process were provided to the respondent.

(3) The respondent would benefit from continuation in the CARE process.

(4) The respondent currently meets the requirements in Section 5972.

(c) A respondent may only be reappointed to the CARE process once, for up to one additional year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 7.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5977.4.

(a) In all CARE Act proceedings, the judicial officer shall control the proceedings during the hearings with a view to the expeditious and effective ascertainment of the jurisdictional facts and the ascertainment of all information relative to the present condition and future welfare of the respondent. Except when there is a contested issue of fact or law, the proceedings shall be conducted in an informal nonadversarial atmosphere with a view to obtaining the maximum cooperation of the respondent, all persons interested in the respondent’s welfare, and all other parties, with any provisions that the court may make for the disposition and care of the respondent. The court and relevant local public agencies shall
 cooperate to develop a comprehensive set of objectives established to improve performance of the CARE system in a vigorous and ongoing manner. The court is authorized to coordinate and participate in meetings to improve system performance. All evaluations and reports, documents, and filings submitted to the court pursuant to CARE Act proceedings shall be confidential.

(b) The hearings described in this chapter shall occur in person unless the
 court, in its discretion, allows a party or witness to appear remotely through the use of remote technology. The respondent shall have the right to be in person for all hearings.

(c) Consistent with its constitutional rulemaking authority, the Judicial Council shall adopt rules to implement the policies and provisions in this section and in Sections 5977 to 5977.4, inclusive, to promote statewide consistency, including, but not limited to, what is included in the petition form packet, communications between the CARE Act court and the juvenile court, if applicable, the role of the judiciary to improve system performance, and the process by which counsel will be appointed.

(d) (1) Consistent with paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 56.10 of the Civil
 Code, the county behavioral health agency shall include in any report evaluation, or other document filed with the court, the information, including protected health information, necessary to support the determinations, conclusions, and recommendations in the filing. The county behavioral health agency shall not, unless ordered to do so by the court, submit to the court original or photocopied records underlying the information in a report evaluation or other document required or ordered under this subdivision. The county behavioral health agency shall serve an unredacted copy of any report evaluation, or other document filed with the court on the respondent and the respondent’s counsel and, with the consent of the respondent, on the supporter in a manner authorized by law. Neither a county nor an employee or agent thereof shall be held civilly or criminally liable for any disclosure authorized or
 required by this paragraph.

(2) (A) Consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10 of the Civil Code, a provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, or a covered entity, as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, may disclose to the county behavioral health agency any information, including protected health information, and mental health records excluding psychotherapy notes, in its possession about the respondent that is relevant to the county behavioral health agency’s provision, coordination, or management of services and supports under this part, including, but not limited to, the preparation of any required investigations, evaluations, or reports. Such a disclosure is a disclosure for treatment purposes, which may be made only to the
 extent permitted under Section 164.506 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The information disclosed may include substance use disorder patient records only to the extent permitted by Part 2 (commencing with Section 2.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Consistent with paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 56.10 of the Civil Code, a provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, or a covered entity, as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that filed a CARE Act petition or executed an affidavit included with a CARE Act petition pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 5975 shall provide to the county behavioral health agency any information, including protected health information, and mental health records excluding psychotherapy
 notes, in its possession about the respondent that may be relevant in connection with an investigation, evaluation, or other report or hearing under this part, or with the provision of services and supports under this part. The provision of information under this paragraph is a disclosure required by law, which may be made only to the extent permitted under subdivision (a) of Section 164.512 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The information disclosed shall include substance use disorder patient records only to the extent permitted by Part 2 (commencing with Section 2.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) The county behavioral health agency may apply to the court ex parte for an order requiring any provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, or any covered entity, as defined in
 Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to provide to the county behavioral health agency, to the court, or both, any information, including, but not limited to, protected health information, and mental health records excluding psychotherapy notes, in its possession about the respondent that may be relevant in connection with an investigation, evaluation, or other report or hearing under this part, or with the provision of services and supports under this part. The provision of information under this paragraph is a disclosure required by law, which may be made only to the extent permitted under Section 164.512 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The information ordered to be disclosed may include substance use disorder patient records only to the extent permitted by Part 2 (commencing with Section 2.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) A provider of health care or covered entity shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any disclosure authorized or required by this section.

(E) The county behavioral health agency shall notify the respondent of a disclosure under this paragraph as follows:

(i) By mail at the respondent’s last known address, if any.

(ii) To the respondent’s counsel.

(iii) By including a copy of the notification under clause (i) or (ii) with the next notice of hearing served upon the respondent, if any.

(F) All information, including the facts and
 records, or summary thereof, shared under this subdivision shall further be disclosed to the respondent and the respondent’s counsel, and with the consent of the respondent, to the supporter.

(3) (A) Except as expressly provided, further disclosure or redisclosure of information is not authorized by this subdivision.

(B) Information disclosed to a county behavioral health agency by a provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, or a covered entity, as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations is confidential and not subject to disclosure or inspection under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(C) Disclosure of information under this part shall not be deemed to in any way alter the duties or responsibilities of a county behavioral health agency, of a provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, or of a covered entity, as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, with respect to the disclosed information under the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code), or the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 640, Sec. 7.   (SB 42)   Effective September 27, 2024.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5978.

(a) A court may refer an individual from assisted outpatient treatment, from conservatorship proceedings pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 (LPS conservatorship), from misdemeanor proceedings pursuant to Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code, or from felony proceedings pursuant to Section 1370 of the Penal Code to the CARE Act court.

(b) The CARE Act court may consider a referral made pursuant to this section to be a petition satisfying the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5977 if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The referral contains
 all of the information required to be included in a CARE process petition pursuant to Section 5975.

(2) The information included in the referral makes a prima facie showing that the respondent is, or may be, a person described in Section 5972.

(c) If the CARE Act court elects to consider a referral to be a petition pursuant to subdivision (b), the CARE Act court shall notify the referring court that the referral has been accepted as a petition for CARE Act proceedings.

(d) If the CARE Act court does not elect to consider a referral to be a petition pursuant to subdivision (b), the CARE Act court shall order the appropriate petitioner candidate to do the following within 14 court days:

(1) Complete an investigation to determine whether to file a petition on behalf of the referred individual.

(2) Notify the referring court whether it intends to file a CARE Act petition on behalf of the referred individual.

(e) If the appropriate petitioner candidate notifies the CARE Act court that it requires additional time to complete its investigation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the CARE Act court may grant an extension of up to 30 court days.

(f) For purposes of this section, “appropriate petitioner candidate” means:

(1) For referrals from assisted outpatient treatment or from misdemeanor or felony proceedings, the county behavioral health director or their designee.

(2) For referrals from conservatorship proceedings, the conservator or proposed conservator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 8.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5978.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, “facility” means a facility that provides assessment, evaluation, and crisis intervention pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5150, or a designated facility as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 5008.

(b) A facility may refer an individual treated under an involuntary hold pursuant to Articles 1 to 4.7, inclusive, and Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of this Division to the county behavioral health agency of the county in which the individual resides, or the county in which the individual is receiving involuntary treatment, if they believe that the individual meets or is likely to meet criteria to qualify for the CARE process,
 as described in Section 5972.

(1) Referrals pursuant to this section shall be authorized by a licensed behavioral health professional, employed, by or contracted by the facility, who has knowledge of the individual’s case and has been involved in the individual’s treatment during their involuntary hold. Documentation of the authority for a referral pursuant to this paragraph shall be signed by the licensed behavioral health professional or their designee.

(2) If the facility chooses to make a referral pursuant to subdivision (b), the facility shall make
 the referral pursuant to this section as soon as clinically indicated as part of the individual’s discharge planning process.

(3) The facility referral shall include contact information for the referred individual, including a telephone number and address, if available, and other information as specified by the department.

(c) Within 14 business days of the referral by the facility, the county behavioral health agency shall complete assessment of the individual referred pursuant to this section and shall file a petition pursuant to Section 5975 if the county behavioral health agency determines that the individual meets or is likely to meet criteria for the CARE process and the individual does not engage in voluntary treatment.

(d) In accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 5984, the department shall develop a referral form to be used by the facility and issue guidance regarding the following:

(1) The procedure for a facility to refer an individual to a county behavioral health agency pursuant to this section.

(2) County behavioral health agency data reporting requirements regarding referrals made pursuant to this section include, but are not limited to, total referrals, outcomes of referrals, reason for not filing a petition, length of time from referral to outcome, and services provided for those engaged voluntarily.

(e) The department shall include data regarding referrals made pursuant
 to this section as part of the annual CARE Act report required by Section 5985.

(f) This section does not authorize a facility to continue an involuntary hold on a referred individual who no longer meets the criteria for involuntary treatment solely for the purpose of allowing the county behavioral health agency to complete its assessment pursuant to subdivision (b).

(g) This section does not affect the ability of a facility to make a referral for assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5346.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 640, Sec. 8.   (SB 42)   Effective September 27, 2024.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5978.2.

(a) (1) If a petition to initiate CARE Act proceedings has been filed based on a referral pursuant to Section 5978, the CARE Act court and the referring court may communicate with each other regarding the status of respondent’s cases and any relevant court orders while the cases are still pending in both courts.

(2) If a petition to initiate CARE Act proceedings has been filed for a respondent within a juvenile court’s dependency, delinquency, or transition
 jurisdiction, the CARE Act court and the juvenile court may communicate with each other regarding the status of respondent’s cases and any relevant court orders while the cases are still pending in both courts.

(b) The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. All communications about the disposition of a respondent’s case shall be conducted in court and on the record.

(c) Communication between courts on schedules, calendars, court records, and similar matters may occur without informing the parties. A record need not be made of the communication.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), a record must be made of a communication pursuant to this section. The parties shall be informed promptly of the communication and granted access to the record.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 640, Sec. 9.   (SB 42)   Effective September 27, 2024.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Accountability [5979. - 5979.]

5979.

(a) (1) If, at any time during the proceedings, the court determines by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is not participating in the CARE process, after the respondent receives notice, or is not adhering to their CARE plan, after the respondent receives notice, the court may terminate the respondent’s participation in the CARE process.

(2) To ensure the respondent’s safety, the court may utilize existing legal authority pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Chapter 2 of Part 1. The court shall provide notice to the county behavioral health agency and the Office of the Public Conservator and Guardian if the court utilizes that authority.
